California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

45652.2.

Notwithstanding Section 45652, a refund of an overpayment of any fee, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

45652.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Section 45652 that is made in the case in which the amount of fee determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of fee determined” means an amount of fee, interest, or penalty, with respect
 to a single determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 45201) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 45351) of Chapter 3.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 8.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

45653.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the state on account of the overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45654.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim, in whole or in part, the board shall serve written notice of its action on the claimant pursuant to Section 45201.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45655.

Interest shall be computed, allowed, and paid upon any overpayment of any amount of fee at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the first day of the monthly period following the period during which the overpayment was made. For purposes of this section, “monthly period” means the month commencing on the day after the due date of the payment through the same date as the due date in each successive month. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the
 amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the monthly period following the date upon which the claimant, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the fee or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

45656.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [45701. - 45708.]

45701.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state or against any office of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection of any fee sought to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45702.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45703.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45704.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45705.

Failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the state on account of any alleged overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45706.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any fees due from the plaintiff, and the balance shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45707.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment, or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45708.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any fee paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the fee payer paying the tax or by any person other than the person who has paid the fee.

As used in this section, “assignee” does not include a person who has acquired the business of the fee payer which gave rise to the fees and who is thereby a successor in interest to the fee payer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [45751. - 45754.]

45751.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering
 any erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 45201) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 45351) of Chapter 3. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

45752.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of fee nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 45751, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 45751 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 94.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

45753.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 45751, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

45754.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 45751, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 45752 (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 41) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 501.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [45801. - 45801.]

45801.

If any amount has been illegally determined, either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 79.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Administration [45851. - 45872.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [45851. - 45855.6.4.]

45851.

The board shall enforce this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45852.

The board may make such examinations of the books and records of any fee payer as it may deem necessary in carrying out this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45853.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators, and other expert and clerical assistance necessary to enforce its powers and perform its duties under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45854.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.

Any information regarding solid wastes which is available to the board shall be made available to the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 654, Sec. 24.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 45151), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with
 the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.6.

(a) The board shall determine which feepayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A feepayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 36.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.6.1.

A feepayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the feepayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The feepayer’s business or activities involve few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The feepayer’s business or activities involve a single or a small number of clearly defined taxability or liability issues.

(c) The feepayer is subject to the fee imposed pursuant to Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The feepayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 37.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.6.2.

(a) If the board selects a feepayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions or activities covered by the managed
 audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the feepayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the feepayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions or activities are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The feepayer shall:

(A) Examine its books and
 records to determine if it has any unreported liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations and books and records examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the feepayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 38.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.6.3.

Nothing in this article limits the board’s authority to examine the books and records of a feepayer under Section 45852.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 39.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

45855.6.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the feepayer in a manner to be determined by the board
 under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 40.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [45856. - 45872.]

45856.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45857.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of fee payer complaints and problems, including any fee payer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of fee payers by board employees, and staying actions where fee payers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would
 otherwise accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45858.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Fee payers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered fee payers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of fee payer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of fee payer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to fee payer activities and areas of recurrent fee payer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45859.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual fee payers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Integrated Waste Management Fee Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between fee payers and the government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 52.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45860.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and fee payers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to fee payers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional fees, any subsequent notice of fees due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual fee information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45861.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45862.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with fee payers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

45863.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include the determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard
 timeframe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 654, Sec. 25.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

45864.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the fee payer and the fee payer is entitled to receive a copy
 of the recording.

(c) The fee payer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45865.

(a) Every fee payer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The fee payer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the fee payer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

45866.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include integrated waste management fee violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of
 informants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 54.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45867.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to fee matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation,
 the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil fee matter in dispute involving a reduction of fee or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of fee and penalties in settlement does not exceed
 eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance, with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of fees, or penalties, or total fees and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one year, in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the feepayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the
 director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or the national defense.

(d) The director shall not participate in the settlement of fee matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in
 subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial
 submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement considered or entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential information for purposes of Section 45982.

(h) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or
 guideline established or issued by the department in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 30.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

45867.5.

(a) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2007, the executive director and chief counsel of the board, or their delegates, may compromise any final fee liability where the reduction of fees is seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or less.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the
 board, upon recommendation by its executive director and chief counsel, jointly, may compromise a final fee liability involving a reduction in fees in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Any recommendation for approval of an offer in compromise that is not either approved or disapproved within 45 days of the submission of the recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(3) The board, itself, may by resolution delegate to the executive director and the chief counsel, jointly, the authority to compromise a final fee liability in which the reduction of fees is in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final fee liability” means any final fee liability arising under Part 23 (commencing with Section 45001), or related interest, additions to fees, penalties, or other
 amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the fee payer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the fee payer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The fee payer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the fee payer’s present assets or income.

(B) The fee payer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the fee payer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final fee liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for
 liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid fee and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the fee payer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the fee payer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the board shall notify the fee payer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the fee payer.

(i) When more than one fee payer is liable for the
 debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, fee payers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable fee payer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other fee payers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of fees or penalties or total fees and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the executive director of the board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the fee payer.

(2) The amount of unpaid fees and related penalties, additions to fee, interest, or other
 amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the fee payer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 45855. No list shall be prepared and no releases distributed by the board in connection with these statements.

(k) Any compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either
 of the following occurs:

(1) The board determines that any person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the board any property belonging to the estate of any fee payer or other person liable for the fee.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any book, document, or record or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the fee payer or other person liable for the fee.

(2) The fee payer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) Any person who, in connection with any offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that
 agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from any officer or employee of this state any property belonging to the estate of a fee payer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record, or makes any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the fee payer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the fee payer, any member of the fee payer’s family, any corporation, agent, fiduciary, or
 representative of, or any other individual or entity acting on behalf of, the fee payer, or any other corporation or entity owned or controlled by the fee payer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the fee payer, directly or indirectly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 585.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

45868.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the feepayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:
